Washington statutes.
RCW 18.08.330

Board for architects—Membership.

There is created a state board for architects consisting of seven members who shall be appointed by the governor. Six members shall be registered architects who are residents of the state and have at least eight years' experience in the practice of architecture as registered architects in responsible charge of architectural work or responsible charge of architectural teaching. One member shall be a public member, who is not and has never been a registered architect and who does not employ and is not employed by or professionally or financially associated with an architect.

The terms of each newly appointed member shall be six years.

Every member of the board shall receive a certificate of appointment from the governor. On the expiration of the term of each member, the governor shall appoint a successor to serve for a term of six years or until the next successor has been appointed.

The governor may remove any member of the board for cause. Vacancies in the board for any reason shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term.

The board shall elect a chair, a vice chair, and a secretary. The secretary may delegate his or her authority to the executive director.

Members of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2010 c 129 s 3; 1985 c 37 s 4.]